Mississippi, session 2026, HB506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Scenic Rivers Development Alliance to assist in paying costs associated with the projects described in Section 2 of this act for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027................................................ $ 10,000,000.00 SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be used by the Scenic Rivers Development Alliance for the following projects: (a)  Site development and other facility development at the Okhissa Lake Lodge and Conference Center in Franklin County, Mississippi; and (b)  Site development; acquisition of facility equipment; parking repairs and improvements; road repairs and improvements; building repairs and improvements; river/lake access; erosion control/repairs; utility improvements; trail improvements; and other facility related upgrades in Franklin, Walthall, Pike, Amite and Wilkinson Counties, Mississippi. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.